Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-302 Annual and quarterly filings
with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. (a) Each
domestic, foreign, and alien insurer that is authorized to transact insurance
in this State shall file annually with the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners, on or before March 1 of each year, a copy of its annual
statement convention blank, statement of actuarial opinion by a qualified
actuary or specialist, and additional filings as prescribed by the commissioner
for the preceding year. Each insurer shall file quarterly, on or before the
forty-fifth day after each quarter, a copy of its quarterly statement with the
National Association of Insurance Commissioners. The information filed with
the National Association of Insurance Commissioners shall be in the same format
and scope as that required by the commissioner and shall include the signed
jurat page and the actuarial certification. Any amendments and addenda to the
statement filing subsequently filed with the commissioner shall also be filed
with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. In addition to the
printed annual and quarterly filings addressed in this section, the annual and
quarterly filings shall also be filed electronically in the format prescribed
by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners' annual statement
instructions. The annual and quarterly electronic filings shall be due on the
same dates as the corresponding printed information.

(b) Any insurer failing or refusing to submit
the annual or quarterly filings in accordance with this section shall be liable
for a penalty in an amount not less than $100 and not more than $500 for each
day of delinquency. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1993, c 205, §7; am L 1994,
c 190, §§2, 10; am L 1995, c 61, §2 as superseded by c 232, §§4, 12; am L 1997,
c 368, §2; am L 1999, c 302, §9 as superseded by c 128, §2; am L 2003, c 212,
§23]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next